Nebraska, session 109, LB841.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB841 LB841
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-1139, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1139 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Educational decision maker means a person designated or ordered
by a court to make educational decisions on behalf of a student; and
(b) Surrogate means a surrogate for the parents assigned pursuant to
section 79-1161.
(2) Each school district shall include only students identified and
verified pursuant to sections 79-1137 and 79-1138 in special education
programs and shall not provide special education services pursuant to the
Special Education Act to any child who has not been so identified and
verified.
(3) Each school district shall provide special education services to
each student identified and verified pursuant to sections 79-1137 and
79-1138 as directed in the student's individualized education program.
(4) No school district shall implement a change to an individualized
education program without consent from the student's parent, legal
guardian, educational decisionmaker, or surrogate unless:
(a) The school district documents reasonable efforts to obtain such
consent and no response is received from the student's parent, legal
guardian, educational decisionmaker, or surrogate within ten calendar
days following such efforts; or
(b) The school district obtains approval to implement such change
through a hearing conducted pursuant to sections 79-1161 to 79-1167.
Sec. 2. Section 79-1164, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1164 (1) Upon the receipt of a petition filed under section
79-1162, the department shall assign it to a hearing officer. The hearing
officer shall receive all subsequent pleadings and shall conduct the
hearing.
(2) At the hearing the parties shall present evidence on the issues
-2-

LB841 LB841
2026 2026
raised in the pleadings.
(3) The school district shall have the burden of proof and the
burden of production.
(4) At the completion of the proceedings, the hearing officer shall
prepare a report based on the evidence presented containing findings of
fact and conclusions of law.
(5) Within forty-five days after the receipt of a request for a
hearing, the hearing officer shall prepare a final decision and order
directing such action as may be necessary. At the request of either party
for good cause shown, the hearing officer may grant specific extensions
of time beyond this period.
(6) The report and the final decision and order shall be delivered
via certified mail to each party or attorney of record and to the
Commissioner of Education.
Sec. 3. Original sections 79-1139 and 79-1164, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-